trunk/apertium-br-fr/apertium-br-fr.br.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>AaBbChchC’hc’hDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLlMmNnOoPpRrSsTtUuVvWwYyZzùÙêÊñÑâÂîÎôÔûÛüÜ'ÇçÉéÈèXxQqÏïœæàÀáÁèÈéÉËë</alphabet>

  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"      c="Nom"/>
    <sdef n="np"     c="Nom propre"/>
    <sdef n="num"    c="Numeral"/>

    <sdef n="mf"     c="Masculin/feminin"/>
    <sdef n="m"      c="Gourel (Masculin)"/>
    <sdef n="f"      c="Benel (Feminin)"/>
    <sdef n="sg"     c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl"     c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="sp"     c="Singular/plural"/>

    <sdef n="acr"    c="Acronimo"/>
    <sdef n="top"    c="Toponym"/>
    <sdef n="ant"    c="Anthroponym"/>
    <sdef n="cog"    c="Cognomen"/>
    <sdef n="al"     c="Autres"/>

    <sdef n="pr"     c="Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" c="Conjonction de coordination"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub" c="Conjonction de subordination"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv" c="Conjonction adverbial"/>

    <sdef n="prn"    c="Pronom"/>

    <sdef n="subj"   c="Subjet"/>
    <sdef n="obj"    c="Objet"/>
    <sdef n="rel"    c="Relatif"/>

    <sdef n="opt"    c="Optatif"/>
    <sdef n="ppres"  c="Present participle"/>
    <sdef n="neg"    c="Negatif"/>
    <sdef n="ref"    c="Reflexif"/>

    <sdef n="ij"     c="Interjection"/>
    <sdef n="adv"    c="Adverbe"/>
    <sdef n="preadv" c="Preadverbe"/>

    <sdef n="adj"    c="Adjectif"/>
    <sdef n="sint"   c="Synthetic"/>
    <sdef n="comp"   c="Comparatif"/>
    <sdef n="sup"    c="Superlatif"/>
    <sdef n="excl"   c="Exclamatif"/>
    <sdef n="itg"    c="Interrogatif"/>

    <sdef n="vblex"  c="Verb"/>
    <sdef n="vbloc"  c="Verb (locative form)"/>

    <sdef n="vpart"  c="Verbal particle"/>

    <sdef n="inf"    c="Infinitif"/>
    <sdef n="pri"    c="Present indicative"/>
    <sdef n="pii"    c="Imperfect"/>
    <sdef n="prh"    c="Present habitual"/>
    <sdef n="pih"    c="Imperfect habitual"/>
    <sdef n="cni"    c="Conditional"/>
    <sdef n="cip"    c="Past conditional"/>
    <sdef n="imp"    c="Imperative"/>
    <sdef n="past"   c="Past definite"/>
    <sdef n="pp"     c="Past participle"/>
    <sdef n="fti"    c="Future indicative"/>
    <sdef n="ger"    c="Particle for present participle"/>

    <sdef n="p1"     c="1st person"/>
    <sdef n="p2"     c="2nd person"/>
    <sdef n="p3"     c="3rd person"/>
    <sdef n="impers" c="Impersonal"/>

    <sdef n="det"    c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="predet" c="Pre-determiner"/>
    <sdef n="ind"    c="Indefinite"/>
    <sdef n="def"    c="Definite"/>
    <sdef n="dem"    c="Demonstratif"/>
    <sdef n="pos"    c="Possessive"/>
    <sdef n="ord"    c="Ordinal"/>

    <sdef n="cm"     c="Coma"/>
    <sdef n="apos"   c="Apostrophe"/>
    <sdef n="guio"   c="Hyphen"/>
    <sdef n="sent"   c="End of sentence marker"/>

    <sdef n="ND"/>
    <sdef n="GD"/>
  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="personas">
      <e>
        <re>[A-Z][a-zë]+ Le [A-Z][a-zë]+</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>It</l>
          <r>It</r>
        </p>
        <re>.? ([A-Z][a-z]*|[A-Z][a-z]* [A-Z][a-z]*|[A-Z][a-z]* [A-Z].? [A-Z][a-z]*)</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>It.It</l>
          <r>It.It</r>
        </p>
        <re>.? ([A-Z][a-z]*|[A-Z][a-z]* [A-Z][a-z]*|[A-Z][a-z]* [A-Z].? [A-Z][a-z]*)</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>Dim</l>
          <r>Dim</r>
        </p>
        <re>.? ([A-Z][a-z]*|[A-Z][a-z]* [A-Z][a-z]*|[A-Z][a-z]* [A-Z].? [A-Z][a-z]*)</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>Dim.Dim</l>
          <r>Dim.Dim</r>
        </p>
        <re>.? ([A-Z][a-z]*|[A-Z][a-z]* [A-Z][a-z]*|[A-Z][a-z]* [A-Z].? [A-Z][a-z]*)</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>an<b/>dimezell<b/></l>
          <r>an<b/>dimezell<b/></r>
        </p>
        <re>[A-Z][a-z]+</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>an<b/>itron<b/></l>
          <r>an<b/>itron<b/></r>
        </p>
        <re>[A-Z][a-z]+</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>an<b/>aotrou<b/></l>
          <r>an<b/>aotrou<b/></r>
        </p>
        <re>[A-Z][a-z]+</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>Ao</l>
          <r>Ao</r>
        </p>
        <re>.? ([A-Z][a-z]*|[A-Z][a-z]* [A-Z][a-z]*|[A-Z][a-z]* [A-Z].? [A-Z][a-z]*)</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>Ao.Ao</l>
          <r>Ao.Ao</r>
        </p>
        <re>.? ([A-Z][a-z]*|[A-Z][a-z]* [A-Z][a-z]*|[A-Z][a-z]* [A-Z].? [A-Z][a-z]*)</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="horas">
      <e>
        <re>[0-2]?[0-9]</re>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <re>[0-2]?[0-9]</re>
        <p>
          <l>e.</l>
          <r>e<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <re>[0-2]?[0-9]</re>
        <p>
          <l><b/>e.</l>
          <r>e<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="distàncies">
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+</re>
        <p>
          <l><b/>km</l>
          <r><b/>km<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <re>[0-9]+</re>
        <p>
          <l>km</l>
          <r><b/>km<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="fechas">
      <e>
        <re>1</re>
        <p>
          <l>añ</l>
          <r>añ<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>2</re>
        <p>
          <l>l</l>
          <r>l<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[34]</re>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
	
    <pardef n="anys">
      <e>
        <re>[MCDXLVI]*</re>
        <p>
          <l>vet</l>
          <r>vet<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[I]+</re>
        <p>
          <l>añ</l>
          <r>añ<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>	
	
    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>1</l>
          <r>1<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="acronimos">
      <e>
        <re>[A-Z][A-Z]+([A-Z])?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <re>[A-Z][0-9]+([0-9])?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="urls">
      <e>
        <re>(((www.)|(http://))[a-z\-]+([.][a-z\-]+)+)</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e>
      <par n="horas"/> <!-- Horas -->
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="anys"/> <!-- Anys -->
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="fechas"/> <!-- Fechas -->
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="numeros"/> <!-- Numbers -->
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="acronimos"/> <!-- Acronyms -->
    </e>
    <e><par n="urls"/></e>
    <e><par n="distàncies"/></e>
    <e><par n="personas"/></e>
